Utah statutes.
70A-2a-515.   Acceptance of goods.
(1)  Acceptance of goods occurs after:
(a)  the lessee has had a reasonable opportunity to inspect the goods and the
lessee signifies or acts with respect to the goods in a manner that signifies
to the lessor or the supplier that the goods are conforming or that the lessee
will take or retain them in spite of their nonconformity; or
(b)  the lessee fails to make an effective rejection of the goods as provided
in Subsection 70A-2a-509 (2).
(2)  Acceptance of a part of any commercial unit is acceptance of that entire
unit.
